Indiana, session 2026, HB1314.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-25.5-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Postconviction Proceedings
Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "public defender" means the
state public defender appointed under IC 33-40-1-1.
Sec. 1. (a) A person who has been convicted of, or sentenced for,
a crime by a court of this state, and who claims:
(1) that the conviction or the sentence was in violation of the
Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of the State
of Indiana, or the laws of this state;
(2) that the court was without jurisdiction to impose the
sentence;
(3) that the sentence exceeds the maximum sentence
authorized by law, or is otherwise erroneous;
(4) that there exists evidence of material facts that:
(A) could not have been discovered previously through the
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


exercise of due diligence; and
(B) if proven and viewed in light of the evidence as a whole,
would be sufficient to establish by clear and convincing
evidence that no reasonable trier of fact would have found
the person guilty of the underlying offense;
(5) that the person's sentence has expired or that the person's
probation, parole, or conditional release has been unlawfully
revoked; or
(6) that the conviction or sentence is otherwise subject to
collateral attack upon any grounds of alleged error available
under any common law, statutory or other writ, motion,
petition, proceeding, or remedy;
may institute a postconviction proceeding under this chapter to
secure relief.
(b) This chapter is not a substitute for a direct appeal from the
conviction or the sentence and all available steps, including those
under Rule PC 2 of the Indiana Rules of Post-Conviction Remedies
that should be taken to perfect the appeal. Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, this chapter comprehends and takes the
place of all other common law, statutory, or other remedies
otherwise available for challenging the validity of the conviction or
sentence and it shall be used exclusively in place of them.
(c) This chapter does not suspend the writ of habeas corpus, but
if a person applies for a writ of habeas corpus in the county where
the person is incarcerated and challenges the validity of the
conviction or sentence, the court in the county where the person is
incarcerated shall transfer the cause to the court in which the
conviction took place, and the convicting court shall treat it as a
petition for relief under this chapter.
(d) A petition filed by a person who has been convicted or
sentenced for a crime by a court of this state that seeks to require
forensic DNA testing or analysis of any evidence, whether
denominated as a petition filed under IC 35-38-7-5 or not, is
considered a petition for postconviction relief.
(e) A petition seeking to present new evidence challenging the
person's guilt or the appropriateness of the person's sentence,
when brought by a person who has been sentenced to death and
who has completed state postconviction review proceedings,
whether denominated as a petition filed under IC 35-50-2-9(k) or
not, is considered a successive petition for postconviction relief
under section 11 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) A person who claims relief under this chapter or who
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


otherwise challenges the validity of a conviction or sentence must
file a verified petition with the clerk of the court in which the
conviction took place, except that a person who claims that the
person's parole has been unlawfully revoked must file a verified
petition with the clerk of the court in the county in which the
person is incarcerated. Three (3) copies of the verified petition
must be filed and no deposit or filing fee shall be required.
(b) The clerk of the court shall file the petition upon its receipt
and deliver a copy to the prosecuting attorney of that judicial
circuit. In capital cases, the clerk of the court shall, in addition to
delivering a copy of the petition to the prosecuting attorney,
immediately deliver a copy of the petition to the attorney general.
If an affidavit of indigency is attached to the petition, the clerk of
the court shall call this to the attention of the court. If the court
finds that the petitioner is indigent, it shall allow the petitioner to
proceed in forma pauperis. If the court finds the indigent petitioner
is incarcerated in the department of correction, and has requested
representation, it shall order a copy of the petition sent to the
public defender.
Sec. 3. (a) The petition shall be submitted in a form in
substantial compliance with the standard form established by the
supreme court. The standard form shall be available without
charge from the public defender, who shall also see that the forms
are available at every penal institution in this state.
(b) The petition shall be made under oath and the petitioner
shall verify the correctness of the petition, the authenticity of all
documents and exhibits attached to the petition, and the fact that
the petitioner has included every ground for relief under section 1
of this chapter known to the petitioner.
(c) Documents and information excluded from public access
pursuant to the Indiana Rules on Access to Court Records shall be
filed in accordance with Trial Rule 5(G) of the Indiana Rules of
Trial Procedure.
Sec. 4. (a) Not later than thirty (30) days after the filing of the
petition, or within any further reasonable time the court may fix,
the state, by the attorney general in capital cases or by the
prosecuting attorney in noncapital cases, shall respond by answer
stating the reasons, if any, why the relief prayed for should not be
granted. The court may make appropriate orders for amendment
of the petition or answer, for filing further pleadings or motions,
or for extending the time of the filing of any pleading.
(b) Not later than ten (10) days after filing a petition for
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


postconviction relief under this chapter, the petitioner may request
a change of judge by filing an affidavit that the judge has a
personal bias or prejudice against the petitioner. The petitioner's
affidavit shall state the facts and the reasons for the belief that this
bias or prejudice exists, and shall be accompanied by a certificate
from the attorney of record that the attorney in good faith believes
that the historical facts recited in the affidavit are true. A change
of judge shall be granted if the historical facts recited in the
affidavit support a rational inference of bias or prejudice. For good
cause shown, the petitioner may be permitted to file the affidavit
after the ten (10) day period. No change of venue from the county
shall be granted. In the event a change of judge is granted under
this section, the procedure set forth in Rule 21 of the Indiana
Administrative Rules shall govern the selection of a special judge.
(c) At any time prior to entry of judgment the court may grant
leave to withdraw the petition. The petitioner shall be given leave
to amend the petition as a matter of right no later than sixty (60)
days before the date the petition has been set for trial. Any later
amendment of the petition shall be by leave of the court.
(d) If the petition is challenging a sentence imposed following a
plea of guilty, the court shall make the transcript part of the
record.
(e) In the event that the petitioner's attorney files with the court
a withdrawal of appearance accompanied by an attorney's
certificate under section 9(c) of this chapter, the case shall proceed
in accordance with this chapter. The petitioner retains the right to
proceed pro se in forma pauperis if indigent. Thereafter, the court
may order the public defender to represent an indigent
incarcerated petitioner if the court makes a preliminary finding
that the proceeding is meritorious and in the interests of justice.
(f) If the public defender has filed an appearance, the public
defender has sixty (60) days to respond to the state's answer to the
petition filed under subsection (a). If the pleadings conclusively
show that the petitioner is entitled to no relief, the court may deny
the petition without further proceedings.
(g) The court may grant a motion by either party for summary
disposition of the petition if it appears from the pleadings,
depositions, answers to interrogatories, admissions, stipulations of
fact, and any affidavits submitted that there is no genuine issue of
material fact and the moving party is entitled to judgment as a
matter of law. The court may ask for oral argument on the legal
issue raised. If an issue of material fact is raised, then the court
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


shall hold an evidentiary hearing as soon as reasonably possible.
Sec. 5. The petition shall be heard without a jury. A record of
the proceedings shall be made and preserved. All rules and statutes
applicable in civil proceedings, including pretrial and discovery
procedures are available to the parties, except as provided in
section 4(b) of this chapter. The court may receive affidavits,
depositions, oral testimony, or other evidence and may at the
court's discretion order the applicant brought before the court for
the hearing. The petitioner has the burden of establishing the
petitioner's grounds for relief by a preponderance of the evidence.
Sec. 6. The court shall make specific findings of fact, and
conclusions of law on all issues presented, whether or not a hearing
is held. If the court finds in favor of the petitioner, the court shall
enter an appropriate order with respect to the conviction or
sentence in the former proceedings, and any supplementary orders
as to arraignment, retrial, custody, bail, discharge, correction of
sentence, or other matters that may be necessary and proper. An
order is a final judgment.
Sec. 7. An appeal may be taken by the petitioner or the state
from the final judgment in a proceeding under this chapter, under
rules applicable to civil actions. Jurisdiction for the appeal shall be
determined by reference to the sentence originally imposed. The
supreme court has exclusive jurisdiction in cases involving an
original sentence of death and the court of appeals has jurisdiction
in all other cases.
Sec. 8. (a) All grounds for relief available to a petitioner under
this chapter must be raised in the original petition.
(b) Any claim adjudicated on the merits in the proceeding that
resulted in the conviction or sentence, or in any other proceeding
the petitioner has taken to secure relief, shall be dismissed and may
not be a basis for postconviction relief under this chapter.
(c) Any claim that was not raised in the proceeding that resulted
in the conviction or sentence, or in any other proceeding the
petitioner has taken to secure relief, shall be dismissed and may not
be a basis for postconviction relief under this chapter unless:
(1) the petitioner's failure to raise the claim was caused by
state action in violation of the Constitution of the United
States or laws of the United States;
(2) the claim relies on a new rule of constitutional or statutory
law, made retroactive to cases on collateral review by the
United States Supreme Court or the supreme court, that was
previously unavailable; or
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


(3) the claim is based on a factual predicate that could not
have been discovered through the exercise of due diligence in
time to present the claim in the proceeding that resulted in the
conviction or sentence, or in any other proceeding the
petitioner has taken to secure relief.
Sec. 9. (a) Upon receiving a copy of the petition, including an
affidavit of indigency, from the clerk of the court, the public
defender may represent any petitioner committed to the
department of correction in all proceedings under this chapter,
including an appeal, if the public defender determines the
proceedings are meritorious and in the interests of justice. The
public defender may refuse representation in any case where the
conviction or sentence being challenged has no present penal
consequences. The petitioner retains the right to employ the
petitioner's own attorney or to proceed pro se, but the court is not
required to appoint counsel for a petitioner other than the public
defender.
(b) If a petitioner elects to proceed pro se, the court at its
discretion may order the cause submitted upon affidavit. The court
is not required to order the personal presence of the petitioner
unless the petitioner's presence is required for a full and fair
determination of the issues raised at an evidentiary hearing. If the
pro se petitioner requests an issuance of a subpoena for a witness
at an evidentiary hearing, the petitioner shall specifically state by
affidavit the reason the witness' testimony is required and the
substance of the witness' expected testimony. If the court finds the
witness' testimony would be relevant and probative, the court shall
order that the subpoena be issued. If the court finds the proposed
witness' testimony is not relevant and probative, it shall enter a
finding on the record and refuse to issue the subpoena. A petitioner
who is indigent and proceeding in forma pauperis is entitled to
production of guilty plea and sentencing transcripts at public
expense, prior to a hearing, if the petition is not dismissed. In
addition, the petitioner is also entitled to a record of the
postconviction proceeding at public expense for appeal of the
denial or dismissal of the petition.
(c) The petitioner's attorney shall confer with the petitioner and
ascertain all grounds for relief under this chapter, amending the
petition if necessary to include any grounds not included by
petitioner in the original petition. In the event that the petitioner's
attorney determines the proceeding is not meritorious or in the
interests of justice, before or after an evidentiary hearing is held,
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


the petitioner's attorney shall file with the court a withdrawal of
appearance, accompanied by a certification that:
(1) the petitioner has been consulted regarding grounds for
relief in the pro se petition and any other possible grounds;
and
(2) appropriate investigation, including a review of the guilty
plea or trial and sentencing records, has been conducted.
The petitioner's attorney shall personally provide the petitioner
with an explanation of the reasons for withdrawal. A petitioner
retains the right to proceed pro se, in forma pauperis if indigent,
after the petitioner's attorney withdraws.
(d) In noncapital cases, the prosecuting attorney of the circuit
in which the court of conviction is situated shall represent the state
in the court of conviction. In capital cases, the attorney general
shall represent the state for purposes of answering the petition, and
the prosecuting attorney shall, at the request of the attorney
general, assist the attorney general. The attorney general shall
represent the state on any appeal arising from this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) If:
(1) a prosecution is initiated against a petitioner who has
successfully sought relief under this chapter and a conviction
is subsequently obtained; or
(2) a sentence has been set aside under this chapter and the
successful petitioner is to be resentenced;
the sentencing court may not impose a more severe penalty than
the penalty originally imposed, unless the court includes in the
record of the sentencing hearing a statement of the court's reasons
for selecting the sentence that the court imposes. The statement
must include reliance upon identifiable conduct on the part of the
petitioner that occurred after the imposition of the original
sentence. The court shall give credit for time served.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) that limit the severity of the
penalty do not apply if:
(1) a conviction based upon a plea agreement is set aside;
(2) the state files an offer to abide by the terms of the original
plea agreement within twenty (20) days after the conviction is
set aside; and
(3) the defendant fails to accept the terms of the original plea
agreement within twenty (20) days after the state's offer to
abide by the terms of the original plea agreement is filed.
Sec. 11. (a) A petitioner may request a second or successive
petition for postconviction relief by completing a properly and
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


legibly completed successive postconviction relief petition form in
substantial compliance with the form prescribed by the supreme
court. Both the successive postconviction relief petition form and
the proposed successive petition for postconviction relief shall be
sent to the clerk of the supreme court, court of appeals, and tax
court.
(b) A claim presented in a second or successive petition for
postconviction relief that was presented in a prior petition for
postconviction relief shall be dismissed.
(c) A claim presented in a second or successive petition for
postconviction relief that was not presented in a prior petition for
postconviction relief must be dismissed unless:
(1) the applicant shows that the claim relies on a new rule of
constitutional law, made retroactive to cases on collateral
review by the United States Supreme Court or the supreme
court, that was previously unavailable; or
(2) the factual predicate for the claim could not have been
discovered previously through the exercise of due diligence,
and the facts underlying the claim, if proven and viewed in
light of the evidence as a whole, would be sufficient to
establish by clear and convincing evidence that, but for
constitutional error, no reasonable trier of fact would have
found the applicant guilty of the underlying offense.
(d) The court may grant the application to file a second or
successive petition for postconviction relief and authorize the filing
of the petition only if it determines that the application makes a
prima facie showing that the petition satisfies the requirements of
this section. In making this determination, the court may consider
applicable law, the petition, and materials from the petitioner's
prior appellate and postconviction proceedings, including the
record, briefs and court decisions, and any other material the court
deems relevant.
(e) The court shall grant or deny the application to file a second
or successive petition for postconviction relief not later than thirty
(30) days after filing of the application, if the court fails to grant or
deny the application to file a second or successive petition for
postconviction relief within thirty (30) days after the filing of the
request, the request is denied without prejudice by operation of
law.
(f) A petitioner may not seek:
(1) rehearing; or
(2) transfer;
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


based on the grant or denial of an application to file a second or
successive petition for postconviction relief.
(g) If the court authorizes the filing of a second or successive
petition for postconviction relief, it must be filed in the court where
the petitioner's first postconviction relief petition was adjudicated.
The petition shall be considered by the same judge who
adjudicated the first petition, if available. The petition shall be
referred to the public defender, who may represent the petitioner
in accordance with section 9 of this chapter. Authorization to file
a second or successive petition is not a determination on the merits
for any other purpose and does not preclude summary disposition
under section 4 of this chapter.
(h) The circuit or superior court shall dismiss any claim
presented in a second or successive petition for postconviction
relief that a court has authorized to be filed unless the applicant
shows that the claim satisfies the requirements of this section and
the claim has been authorized in accordance with this section.
Sec. 12. A one (1) year period of limitation applies to a petition
for postconviction relief filed in a noncapital case. The limitation
period runs from the latest of:
(1) the date on which the judgment became final by the
conclusion of direct review or the expiration of the time for
seeking direct review;
(2) the date on which an impediment to filing an application
created by state action in violation of the Constitution of the
United States or laws of the United States is removed, if the
applicant was prevented from filing by state action;
(3) the date on which the constitutional right asserted was
initially recognized by the United States Supreme Court or
the supreme court, if the right was newly recognized by the
United States Supreme Court or the supreme court, and made
retroactively applicable to cases on collateral review; or
(4) the date on which the factual predicate of the claim or
claims presented could have been discovered through the
exercise of due diligence.
Sec. 13. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a one hundred
eighty (180) day period of limitation applies to a petition for
postconviction relief filed in a capital case. The limitation period
runs from the latest of:
(1) the date on which the judgment became final by the
conclusion of direct review;
(2) the date on which an impediment to filing an application
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106


created by state action in violation of the Constitution of the
United States or laws of the United States is removed, if the
applicant was prevented from filing by state action;
(3) the date on which the constitutional right asserted was
initially recognized by the United States Supreme Court or
the supreme court, if the right was newly recognized by the
United States Supreme Court or the supreme court, and made
retroactively applicable to cases on collateral review; or
(4) the date on which the factual predicate of the claim or
claims presented could have been discovered through the
exercise of due diligence.
(b) The time requirements established by subsection (a) shall be
tolled to exclude the time period from the date that the petitioner
files a petition for certiorari in the United States Supreme Court
until the date of final disposition of the petition for certiorari, if the
petitioner filed a petition for certiorari seeking direct review of the
conviction or sentence.
Sec. 14. This chapter supersedes any other statute or court rule
governing postconviction relief.
Sec. 15. This chapter is severable in accordance with IC 1-1-1-8.
2026 IN 1314—LS 7035/DI 106